Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2018
State Patrol Retirement Fund; State Patrol Retirement Act Expense Fund; created; use.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all money received by the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement System shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the State Patrol Retirement Fund which is hereby created. Out of the fund shall be paid the benefits and annuities as provided in the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act.

(2) The State Patrol Retirement Act Expense Fund is created. The fund shall be credited with money from the retirement system assets and income sufficient to pay the pro rata share of administrative expenses incurred as directed by the board for the proper administration of the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act and necessary in connection with the administration and operation of the retirement system.

Laws 1947, c. 211, § 5, p. 688;

Laws 1959, c. 286, § 7, p. 1086;

Laws 1967, c. 391, § 3, p. 1216;

Laws 1969, c. 511, § 4, p. 2094;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-445;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 50;

Laws 1994, LB 833, § 37;

Laws 2001, LB 408, § 22;

Laws 2005, LB 364, § 16.